Definitions
What is a Disaster?
A useful definition of “disaster” is a natural or man-made emergency whose response needs exceed the available
resources of the affected community. Disasters are not just emergencies that make the news! Large-scale disasters
are sometimes also called catastrophes.
There were 4,215 traffic-related fatalities in California in 2003, yet this was not called a “disaster” because it did not
exceed the affected communities’ abilities to respond. The deaths are certainly personal tragedies, but they do not
meet the requirements of “disaster.”
For comparison, all of the deaths associated with the
September 11, 2001 attacks totaled 2,992. In
addition, the attacks caused billions of direct and
indirect economic losses. That qualifies this humancaused event as a disaster.
A single homicide is a crime and a tragedy, and an
attack on innocent people with political intent is
terrorism. But both may not be a disaster. On the
other hand, the San Simeon, California earthquake
of December 2003 that resulted in only 2 fatalities,
but caused hundreds of millions in property losses,
was a disaster.
Joplin Tornado
This image shows the damage from the EF-5 tornado that
tore through Missouri in 2011 and killed 158 people.
That makes the definition scalable, depending on the size of the affected community.
• When local government resources are exceeded, the state Governor’s Office of Emergency Services (State
OES) is contacted and the Governor is requested to declare a State Disaster.
• When State resources are exceeded, State OES contacts the U.S. Department of Homeland Security’s Federal
Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) and the President is requested to declare a National Disaster.
• This Presidential Declaration triggers funding resources for the public, the state, and local governments to
use for clean-up, repair, recovery, and mitigation.
Disaster professionals define a disaster as a natural or man-made emergency whose
response needs exceed available resources.
What is a Disaster? (continued)
In another example, the Haiti earthquake of 2010
obviously overwhelmed that nation’s ability to respond,
and so was an international disaster. At a smaller scale,
the 2005 landslide at the LaConchita neighborhood in
southern California overwhelmed the neighborhood’s
capacity to respond, and so was a local disaster, but was
not a state disaster.
We must, therefore, always take the scale of an
event into account when we discuss it as a
“disaster.”
What is a Natural Hazard?
A hazardous natural condition is called a natural hazard. Types of hazards include earthquakes, volcanic
eruptions, and the other things we will study this semester.
Hazard Exposure
If a river overflows its bank in an uninhabited area with no roads and no buildings, it is a flood, but not a flood
disaster. If a major earthquake occurs in the desert where no one lives, it is still an earthquake, but not an
earthquake disaster. In dealing with hazards, then, we are concerned about the location of people, buildings,
and infrastructure relative to hazards. The number of these things in harm’s way is our hazard
exposure.
Probability
Probability is the likelihood of a specific type of event occurring in a specific place, at a
specific magnitude, and during a specific time frame. Because the natural events that cause disasters are not
common, calculating their probabilities can be complex. Probability is only one component of “risk.”
Risk
Risk is calculated as the product of extent, effects, probability, and importance of the outcome. Notice that if
any of these factors is zero, risk is zero. If any factor has a high value, risk is increased. For example, for a
tornado in an uninhabited place the effects and importance are zero, meaning this tornado poses no risk. On
the other hand, the tornado that destroyed the town in the above photo obviously caused serious effects and its
outcome was quite important; therefore, tornado risk for this type of tornado in this location was high.
Hazards do not become disasters until they affect people.
Mitigation
Mitigation is activities to reduce losses from future disasters, including prevention and protection. There are two
ways to deal with disasters (Modified from http://quake.abag.ca.gov/mitigation/TheRiskMar05.pdf):
1. We can increase emergency response capability. Thus, more damage needs to occur for those
capabilities to be exceeded. Large incidents become manageable emergencies.
2. Projects can be undertaken to prevent or lessen the impacts of future incidents, and thus reduce the need
for larger and larger response capability. Homes can be moved from areas suffering repeated floods.
Buildings and infrastructure can be built to reduce expected damage in earthquakes. Wood shake shingles
on homes in fire-prone areas can be replaced with asphalt shingles or tile. These actions are examples of
mitigation.
Mitigation can be defined more specifically as “any sustained action taken to reduce
or eliminate the long-term risk to human life and property from hazards.”
As mitigation activities are undertaken, the effects, extent, or importance associated with disasters can be decreased.
(From the South Dakota Office of Emergency Management website at http://oem.sd.gov/mitigation/home.htm ):
“Mitigation Is Not A "Quick Fix."
The interest in initiating change most readily occurs in the immediate post-disaster time period. Public perception is
high and a need for action is most acute. This diminishes rapidly with the passage of time and the realizations that
implementing long-term solutions do not happen over-night. This, coupled with public concern over the price of such
action (financial, economic, political, and social), often places a damper on completing those actions in a timely
manner or even at all.
Nonetheless, the price of inaction outweighs the cost of corrective action. The expense of reconstruction
continues to escalate annually. A community that is well-prepared for disasters through preparation and mitigation is
said to be resilient – they endure the disaster better and recover faster than they would have otherwise. This is also
a good lesson for individuals and families! Resilient families and individuals are well-prepared for disasters.
Mitigation Approaches
Mitigation actions are most often thought of as taking the form of structural or non-structural measures.
Implementation of mitigation actions can take either form or a combination thereof. There are primarily four basic
approaches to mitigation:
1. Altering the Hazard -- Modifying the hazard to eliminate or reduce the frequency of its occurrence.
Triggering avalanches under controlled conditions and cloud seeding to force premature precipitation to
reduce a storm's energy are typical examples.
2. Averting the Hazard -- Redirecting the impact away from a vulnerable location by using structural
devices or land treatment to shield people and development from harm. Dikes, levees, and dams all
represent physical efforts implemented to keep the risk away from the people.
3. Adapting to the Hazard -- Modifying structures and altering design standards of construction.
Identified problems area such as high wind, earthquake, land sliding or subsidence, and heavily forested
terrain all require special building standards and construction practices in order to reduce vulnerability to
damage.
4. Avoiding the Hazard -- Keep people away from the hazard area or limiting development and population
in a risk area. Enforcement actions such as zoning regulations, building codes and ordinances are intended
to restrict, limit, or deny access to specially identified risk areas.
The risks posed by natural hazards can be determined by scientific study. Some kinds of hazards and disasters can
be predicted (tornadoes, hurricanes, floods, volcanic eruptions, landslides, etc.) while others cannot (earthquakes).
The Statistics of Disasters
The natural disasters we study in this course are the result of mankind’s interactions with the natural systems around
us – plate tectonics, magmatic systems, river systems, coastal systems, slope systems, and the atmosphere. On the one
hand, we are concerned with how often hazardous events occur, and on the other we are concerned with how often
these events become disasters.
Consider the following two graphs. The earthquake graph is typical of most kinds of natural hazardous events.
Before turning the page, answer to yourself: What do these graphs tell me about:
1) How many earthquakes (events) occur over time – is there any trend?
2) How will the population trend affect the number of disasters that occur as a result of those earthquakes?
What will graphs of deaths per year and costs of natural disasters look like? Think about these carefully before
continuing.
0
5
10
15
20
25
30
35
40
45
1 7 13 19 25 31 37 43 49 55 61 67 73 79 85 91 97 103
1900 1910 1920 1930 1940 1950 1960 1970 1980 1990 2000
Quakes per year, M7.0 and greater 1900 – 2003
(USGS Nat’l. Earthquake Info. Center).
Increased Disaster Rates?
As this graph shows, the number of natural disasters is increasing over time. That should come as no surprise when
you consider that global population is increasing and people are spreading into more areas around the world. That
naturally exposes more people to risk as time goes by – more die, and the costs of disasters increases.
NASA
Natural Disasters in the United States 1980-2011
This diagram shows the annual totals of the number of events, and the annual totals of specific disasters.
TheEconomist.com
Increased Disaster Rates? (continued)
Earthquakes raise some valuable questions and illustrate the roles of public perception, increasing global
communications, and increasing scientific instrumentation in understanding natural disasters.
Increased Disaster Rates? (continued)
Natural Disaster Cost
This image shows the cost (y-axis of the largest disasters in the world since 1950(NASA).
Increased Disaster Rates? (continued)
From the National Earthquake Information Center (NEIC):
“Q: Why are we having so many earthquakes? Has earthquake activity been increasing?
A: Although it may seem that we are having more earthquakes, earthquakes of magnitude 7.0 or greater have
remained fairly constant throughout this century and, according to our records, have actually seemed to decrease in
recent years. A partial explanation may lie in the fact that in the last twenty years, we have definitely had an increase
in the number of earthquakes we have been able to locate each year. This is because of the tremendous increase in the
number of seismograph stations in the world and the many improvements in global communications.”
Tsunami Damage
The image shows the damage
from the 2011 tsunami in
northern Japan (USAID).
Increased Global Communication
Think of it this way: How many big events happen in the world today without showing up almost instantly on the
internet? Now consider the same big events happening in the 1920’s – would you have heard about them soon or at
all?
Because of instant global communications, we are aware of more events,
including disasters, than any generation before us. Naturally, that
causes us to think that there must be more earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, and
hurricanes than ever before. The actual statistics show otherwise.
Not only are we aware of more events, but because of increasing scientific instrumentation, we also record more
natural events than ever before. With earthquakes, for example, there were only a dozen or so seismometers in the
world a century ago. Today, there are thousands.
How, then, can we compare the number of earthquakes over that long period of time, when we’re obviously recording
quakes today that went unrecorded decades ago? The answer lies in what can be recorded. Earthquakes of
magnitude 7.0 and greater are recorded by all the seismometers on earth; therefore, if we want to compare the
number of earthquakes in recent years to the distant past, we must consider only magnitude 7.0 and greater
earthquakes. (In case you’re wondering, the total number of earthquakes of all magnitudes follows the same trend as
the 7 and greater quakes). That’s why the chart on the previous page looks at only large quakes.
Beware: there are books and websites out there that ignore this simple reality, and show incorrect trends. Always
turn to the authorities for accurate information and explanations (USGS.gov, NOAA.gov, NASA.gov, etc.).
Seismometers
The image above shows seismometer locations in eastern Idaho and the Yellowstone region. Each red dot
is a seismometer. Recording small earthquakes requires a fairly dense network of instruments.
Increased Global Communication (continued)
Magnitude Versus Frequency
Large hazardous events (of all kinds) are less frequent than small events, as illustrated by the earthquake chart below.
This makes sense from a practical point of view. A large volcanic eruption, for example, requires accumulation of a
large amount of magma, which of course takes a longer time than a small eruption that involves only a small amount
of magma. Similarly, the conditions to form a category 5 hurricane require specific, rare factors to come together at
the same place at the same time, but a smaller hurricane forms more easily.
And so in this course while we study mostly large events, we are personally more likely to experience much smaller
versions of them.
Large Earthquakes
This image shows the large earthquakes (7.5M and above) that have occurred since 1900 (USGS/NEIC).
http://www.ngdc.noaa.gov/nndc/servlet/ShowDatasets?dataset=102557&search_look=50&display_look=50.
Data Example: Volcanic Eruptions 1900 – 2009
There were 5530 volcanic eruptions worldwide between 1900 and 2009; 238 of those were considered significant by
the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA). Several of the significant eruptions caused death,
injury, loss of homes, and/or economic loss. The eruptions with the greatest number of deaths, 28000 and 23080,
occurred respectively in 1908 and 1985. Data sources: Smithsonian Global Volcanism Program:
Apply what you have learned so far: Given that this chart only lists known (or recorded) eruptions, what
might explain the upward trend since the 1940’s?
Data Example: Volcanic Eruptions 1900 – 2009
Now consider the following charts. The top one shows events that were large enough to be considered “significant.”
The second shows deaths from “significant” eruptions per year. As expected, the number of events has no trend, but
surprisingly the number of deaths does not, either; in fact, it suggests a slight decrease. This is partly because we
have learned how to predict volcanic eruptions and identify volcanic hazards. In simpler terms, we’re getting better
at getting out of the way.
This illustrates another important point: our ability to predict and mitigate hazards of different kinds depends on the
type of hazard.
NOAA
NOAA
Flood Disasters
Before going to the next page, carefully consider this question:
From what you have studied so far, what do you think is the trend of flood
disasters over time?
Flooding in Italy
St. Mark’s Square, Venice, Italy, 2012
(Atlantic.com).
Consider the nature of floods, the relationships
between cities and rivers, our interactions with
river systems (in ways we do not interact with
quakes and eruptions), and population growth.
Now go to the next page and see if your
prediction was correct!
(http://www.emdat.be/advanced-search
Data Example: Floods
Hopefully, you’re not surprised by this graph!
Cities and towns have historically been built along rivers for the supply of drinking and farming water and the trade,
communications, and fertile soils they provide. As populations grow, we spread into more and more areas, including
flood plains, and we modify river systems. As you will learn in future chapters, urban development also increases the
severity of flooding. And so flood disasters are increasing with time.
The Economic Effects of Disasters
It may not seem obvious at first, but the answer to this question is quite up for debate:
“Are disasters good for the economy?”
As populations increase and more people move into harm’s way, this question is gaining interest. In this discussion
“capital” refers to human, natural, or physical resources. Human capital is the labor force – the people available to
work. Natural capital refers to water, fuels, land, crops, lumber, metals, and so forth. Physical capital refers to roads,
utilities, factories, stores, railroads, and so forth.
Disasters change the mix of human and physical capital, but in different ways depending on the details of the
disaster. A plague, for example, can reduce the number of people available to work while leaving physical facilities
and resources untouched. A hurricane, on the other hand, can destroy physical facilities while leaving the evacuated
labor force intact. Earthquakes, large volcanic eruptions, and floods, on the other hand, tend to destroy both human
and physical capital. Below is the summary of arguments on both sides.
Yes, Disasters Are Good for the Economy source
1) Reconstruction stimulates the construction sector.
2) Facilities and infrastructure destroyed in a disaster are usually rebuilt to higher standards and with
improved technology, leading to higher productivity and efficiency. This leads to long-term economic
improvement.
3) Reconstruction money (grants) stimulates short-term growth throughout the affected community, not just
in the construction sector.
4) Because we are getting better at forecasting atmospheric disasters (tornadoes and hurricanes) and death
tolls from those disasters are smaller than in the past, meaning the human resources toll is smaller,
reconstruction and improved infrastructure and facilities result in a net economic benefit.
5) When a disaster reduces labor capital, there are more physical and natural capital available per person,
resulting in increased economic output and wealth per capita.
No, Disasters Are Bad for the Economy source
1) When a disaster results in large-scale relocation of people and resources, the affected area’s economy
shrinks (example: Hurricane Katrina).
2) As a general principle, societies cannot be made wealthier by destroying resources. Otherwise, Beirut
would be one of the wealthiest places on earth.
3) Disasters make resources scarce – labor, capital, physical facilities, and natural resources – thereby
reducing economic output.
4) When physical capital is destroyed but labor capital is unaffected, economic output falls and per capita
wealth decreases.
Be prepared to discuss this topic as we explore case studies throughout the semester.
The Economic Effects of Disasters (continued)
We will apply these foundational definitions, concepts, statistics, and ideas
to natural hazards of various kinds throughout the semester.
Russian Volcanic Eruption
Tolbachik volcano eruption, Kamchatka, 1975, by Vadim Gippenreiter

Plate Tectonics part 1

Plate Tectonics
Learning Objectives
To understand the earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, and
hazardous landscapes will will study the rest of the
semester, we must first understand the background cause
for them – plate tectonics.
Your goals in studying this chapter are to:
• Discuss how Plate Tectonics theory was developed.
• Describe what features on Earth were created by plate
tectonics.
• Describe the structure of Earth’s interior and tectonic
driving forces.
• Discuss how plates move and interact with one another.
• Describe the geologic features at each type of plate
boundary, and how these relate to hazards.
• Describe what hot spots are and what features they form.
Convergent Plate Boundary
This image from Google Earth shows a convergent plate
boundary (yellow line) and the accompanying volcanic arc
frequently found at this type of ocean-ocean convergence.
** Click on all links. They
are essential to the text.**
Preface
In the early 1960s, the emergence of the theory of plate tectonics started a revolution in the earth sciences.
Since then, scientists have verified and refined this theory, and now have a much better understanding of how our planet
has been shaped by plate-tectonic processes.
We now know that, directly or indirectly, plate tectonics influences nearly all geologic
processes, past and present.
Active Volcano
The mountain (image right) in the background is named
Oldoinyo Lengai. It is an active volcano in the formed in
the East African Rift Zone, a place where Africa is being
pulled apart by plate-tectonic processes. (Photograph by
Jorg Keller, Albert-Ludwigs-Universität Freiburg, Germany.)
This document was supplemented and modified by
faculty of Brigham Young University – Idaho.
Indeed, the notion that the entire Earth's surface is continually shifting has profoundly changed the way we view our world.
People benefit from, and are at the mercy of, the forces and consequences of plate tectonics. With little or no warning, an
earthquake or volcanic eruption can unleash bursts of energy far more powerful than anything we can generate. While we
have no control over plate-tectonic processes, we now have the knowledge to learn from them. The more we know about
plate tectonics, the better we can appreciate the grandeur and beauty of the land upon which we live, as well as the
occasional violent displays of the Earth's awesome power.
Preface (continued)
This booklet gives a brief introduction to the concept of plate tectonics and complements the visual and written
information in This Dynamic Planet (see Further reading), a map published in 1994 by the U.S. Geological Survey
(USGS) and the Smithsonian Institution.
The booklet highlights some of the people and discoveries that advanced the development of the theory and traces
its progress since its proposal. Although the general idea of plate tectonics is now widely accepted,
many aspects still continue to confound and challenge scientists. The earth-science revolution launched
by the theory of plate tectonics is not finished.
Plate Boundaries
The Earth we live on is broken
into a dozen or so rigid slabs that
are moving relative to one
another.
This is the central idea of the
theory of plate tectonics.
The colors on the image represent
the major tectonic plates. There
are 7 major plates and around a
dozen minor plates (USGS).
Historical Perspective
In geologic terms, a plate is a large, rigid slab of solid rock. The
word tectonics comes from the Greek root "to build." Putting
these two words together, we get the term plate tectonics, which
refers to how the Earth's surface is built of plates.
Before the advent of plate tectonics, however, some people
already believed that the present-day continents were the
fragmented pieces of preexisting larger landmasses
("supercontinents").
The diagrams on the right show the break-up of the
supercontinent Pangaea (meaning "all lands" in Greek),
which figured prominently in the hypothesis of continental
drift -- the forerunner to the theory of plate tectonics.
Breakup of Pangea
These diagrams chronical the break up of Pangaea.
This process began about 225-200 million years ago,
eventually fragmenting the supercontinent into the
continents as we know them today.
The theory of plate tectonics states that
the Earth's outermost layer is fragmented
into a dozen or more large and small plates
that are moving relative to one another as
they ride atop hotter, more mobile material.
Detailed Reconstruction
The following reconstructions are based on thousands of geologic and geophysical investigations around the world.
Ma = “mega-annum,” or “million years”
240 Ma = 240 million years, or 240,000,000 years
South
America Africa
North
America
Antarctica
Australia
India
Europe
Asia
240 Million Years
Laurasia
Gondwana
200 Million Years
Detailed Reconstruction (continued)
150 Million Years
Detailed Reconstruction (continued)
South
America
Africa
North
America
Antarctica
Australia
India
Europe
Asia
65 Million Years
Did you notice how the continents moved to their familiar configuration?
Detailed Reconstruction (continued)
Plate tectonics is a relatively new scientific concept, introduced in the early 1960s, but it has revolutionized our
understanding of the dynamic planet upon which we live. The theory has unified the study of the Earth by drawing
together many branches of the earth sciences, from paleontology (the study of fossils) to seismology (the study of
earthquakes). It has provided explanations to questions that scientists had speculated upon for centuries -- such as why
earthquakes and volcanic eruptions occur in very specific areas around the world, and how and why great mountain ranges
like the Alps and Himalayas formed.
Why is the Earth so restless? What causes the ground to shake violently, volcanoes to erupt
with explosive force, and great mountain ranges to rise to incredible heights?
Scientists, philosophers, and theologians have wrestled with questions such as these for centuries. And generally formed two
schools of thought:
1. Catastrophism: Until the 1700s, most Europeans thought that a Biblical Flood played a major role in shaping
the Earth's surface. This way of thinking was known as "catastrophism," and geology (the study of the Earth) was
based on the belief that all earthly changes were sudden and caused by a series of catastrophes.
2. Uniformitarianism: During the mid-19th century, catastrophism gave way to "uniformitarianism," a new way
of thinking centered around the "Uniformitarian Principle" proposed in 1785 by James Hutton, a Scottish
geologist.

Those holding this viewpoint assume that the geologic forces and processes -- gradual as well as catastrophic – acting on
the Earth today are the same as those that have acted in the geologic past.
Historical Perspective (continued)
This principle is commonly stated as follows: The present is the key to the past.
The Beginning of a Theory
The belief that continents have not always been fixed in their present positions was suspected long before the 20th
century; this notion was first suggested as early as 1596 by the Dutch map maker Abraham Ortelius in his work
Thesaurus Geographicus. Ortelius suggested that the Americas were "torn away from Europe and Africa . . . By
earthquakes and floods" and went on to say: "The vestiges of the rupture reveal themselves, if someone brings
forward a map of the world and considers carefully the coasts of the three [continents]."
Ortelius' idea surfaced again in the 19th century. However, it wasn’t until 1912 that the idea of moving continents
was seriously considered as a full-blown scientific hypothesis.
Continental Drift was introduced in two articles published by a 32-year-old
German meteorologist named Alfred Wegener.
Wegner contended that, around 200 million years ago, the supercontinent Pangaea began to split apart. Alexander
Du Toit, Professor of Geology at Witwatersrand University and one of Wegener's staunchest supporters, proposed
that Pangaea first broke into two large continental landmasses:
• Laurasia in the northern hemisphere
• Gondwanaland in the southern hemisphere
The Beginning of a Theory (continued)
Laurasia and Gondwanaland then continued to break apart into the various smaller continents that exist today.
The Separation of Continents (1858 hypothesis)
In 1858, geographer Antonio Snider-Pellegrini made these two maps showing his version of
how the American and African continents may once have fit together, then later separated.
Left: The formerly joined continents before (avant) their separation.
Right: The continents after (aprés) the separation.
(Reproductions of the original maps courtesy of University of California, Berkeley.)
Continental Drift (Continued)
Wegener's hypothesis was based in part on what appeared to him to be the remarkable fit of the South American and
African continents, first noted by Abraham Ortelius three centuries earlier.
Wegener was also intrigued by the occurrences of unusual geologic structures and of plant and animal fossils found
on the matching coastlines of South America and Africa, which are now widely separated by the Atlantic Ocean. He
reasoned that it was physically impossible for most of these organisms to have swum or have been transported
across the vast oceans. To him, the presence of identical fossil species along the coastal parts of Africa and South
America was the most compelling evidence that the two continents were once joined (see image below).
In Wegener's mind, the drifting of continents after the break-up of Pangaea
explained not only the matching fossil occurrences but also the evidence of
paleoclimates on some continents.
Evidences of Paleoclimates
Image shows the present-day locations of certain
fossil plants and animals, currently separated
among the continents.
However, if the continents were rejoined, these
fossils would form definite patterns as shown by the
bands of colors (as noted by Snider-Pellegrini and
Wegener).
For example, the discovery of fossils of tropical plants (in the form of coal deposits) in Antarctica led to the conclusion
that this frozen land previously must have been situated closer to the equator, in a more temperate climate where
lush, swampy vegetation could grow.
Continental Drift (Continued)
Other mismatches of
geology and climate
included:
• Distinctive fossil ferns
(Glossopteris) discovered
in now-polar regions.
• Glacial deposits in
present-day arid Africa,
such as the Vaal River
valley of South Africa.
Continental Drift (continued)
The hypothesis of continental drift would become the spark that
ignited a new way of viewing the Earth. But at the time Wegener
introduced his ideas and evidence, the scientific community firmly
believed the continents and oceans to be permanent features on the
Earth's surface. Not surprisingly, his proposal was not well received,
even though it seemed to agree with the scientific information
available at the time.
A fatal weakness in Wegener's theory was that it could not
satisfactorily answer the most fundamental question raised by his
critics:
What kind of forces could be strong enough to
move such large masses of solid rock over such
great distances?
Wegener suggested that the continents simply plowed through the
ocean floor, but Harold Jeffreys, a noted English geophysicist,
argued correctly that it was physically impossible for a large mass of
solid rock to plow through the ocean floor without breaking
up.
From studies of coastlines and shallow continental shelves in the
northern Atlantic, most geologists realized the continents and ocean
floors were solidly connected, and Wegener’s explanation was
implausible.
Alfred Wegener (1880-1930)
Wegener was the originator of the theory
of continental drift. (Photograph courtesy of
the Alfred Wegener Institute for Polar and Marine
Research, Bremerhaven, Germany.)
Alfred Wegener
Educated as an astronomer and working as a meteorologist,
Wegener’s interest in continental movement began as an
investigation into paleoclimates.
He noted that climate-dependent rocks, including coal, reefs, and
evaporites, are distributed across the globe without relation to today’s
geography. His lack of geological knowledge handicapped him in
formulating his hypothesis of continental drift.
Undaunted by rejection, Wegener devoted the rest
of his life to doggedly pursuing additional
evidence to defend his ideas. He froze to death in
1930 during an expedition crossing the Greenland
ice cap, but the controversy he spawned raged on.
However, after his death, new evidence from ocean floor exploration
and other studies vindicated his hypothesis. Scientists rekindled
interest in Wegener's theory, ultimately leading to the development
of the theory of plate tectonics.
Plate Tectonics
The fundamental difference between continental drift and plate tectonics is their explanations of the role of the
seafloor crust. Continental drift said the oceanic crust was fixed and does not move. Plate tectonics says that the
oceanic crust is part of the mobile plates, and moves along with the continents. And so it is no surprise that study of
the seafloor was key in development of the theory of plate tectonics.
Plate tectonics has proven to be as important to the earth sciences as the discovery of the structure of the atom was to
physics and chemistry and the theory of evolution was to the life sciences. Even though the theory of plate tectonics is
now widely accepted by the scientific community, aspects of the theory are still being investigated today.
Ironically, one of the chief outstanding questions is the one Wegener failed to resolve:
What is the nature of the forces propelling the plates?
Scientists also debate how plate tectonics may have operated (if at all) earlier in the Earth's history and whether
similar processes operate, or have ever operated, on other planets in our solar system.
Watch Tectonics Pioneer J. Tuzo Wilson Discuss Wegener
Developing the Theory
Continental drift was hotly debated off and on for decades following Wegener's death before it was largely dismissed as
being eccentric, preposterous, and improbable. However, beginning in the 1950s, a wealth of new evidence emerged to
revive the debate about Wegener's provocative ideas and their implications.
In particular, four major scientific developments spurred the formulation of the plate-tectonics theory:
(1) Demonstration of the ruggedness and youth of the ocean floor.
(2) Confirmation of repeated reversals of the Earth’s magnetic field in the geologic past.
(3) Emergence of the seafloor-spreading hypothesis and associated recycling of oceanic crust.
(4) Precise documentation that the world's earthquake and volcanic activity is concentrated along oceanic trenches
and submarine mountain ranges.
Ocean Floor Mapping
About two thirds of the Earth's surface lies beneath the oceans. Before the 19th century, the depths of the open ocean
were largely a matter of speculation, and most people thought that the ocean floor was relatively flat and featureless.
Our picture of the ocean floor greatly sharpened after World War I (1914-18),
when echo-sounding devices -- primitive sonar systems -- began to measure
ocean depth by recording the time it took for a sound signal (commonly an
electrically generated "ping") from the ship to bounce off the ocean floor and
return.
Time graphs of the returned signals revealed that the ocean floor was much more rugged than previously thought.
Such echo-sounding measurements clearly demonstrated the continuity and roughness of the submarine mountain
chain in the central Atlantic (later called the Mid-Atlantic Ridge) suggested by the earlier bathymetric
measurements. Mapping of the ocean floor accelerated during World War II, when submarine warfare became
important.
Earth’s Ridge System
The mid-ocean ridge (shown in red) winds its way between the continents, much like the seam on a baseball. Though hidden
beneath the ocean surface, the global mid-ocean ridge system is the most prominent topographic feature on the surface of
our planet.
Ocean Floor Mapping (continued)
Ocean Floor Mapping (continued)
Ocean Floor Mapping (continued)
In 1947, seismologists on the U.S. research ship Atlantis found that the sediment layer on the floor of the Atlantic
was much thinner than originally thought. Scientists had previously believed that the oceans have existed for at
least 4 billion years, so therefore the sediment layer should have been very thick.
Why then was there so little accumulation of sedimentary rock and debris on
the ocean floor?
The answer to this question, which came after further exploration, would prove to be vital to advancing the
concept of plate tectonics. In the 1950s, oceanic exploration greatly expanded. Data gathered by oceanographic
surveys conducted by many nations led to the discovery that a great mountain range on the ocean floor virtually
encircled the Earth.
Called the global mid-ocean ridge, this immense submarine mountain chain -- more than 50,000 kilometers
(km) long and, in places, more than 800 km across -- zig-zags between the continents, winding its way around the
globe like the seam on a baseball. Rising an average of about 4,500 meters(m) above the sea floor, the mid-ocean
ridge overshadows all the mountains in the United States except for Mount McKinley (Denali) in Alaska (6,194 m).
Computer-generated detailed topographic
map of Mid-Oceanic Ridge.
• Warm colors (yellow to red) indicate the
ridge rising above the seafloor.
• Cool colors (green to blue) represent
lower elevations.
This image (at latitude 9° north) is of a small part of
the East Pacific Rise. (Imagery courtesy of Stacey Tighe,
University of Rhode Island.)
Ocean Floor Mapping (continued)
Magnetic striping and polar reversals
Beginning in the 1950s, scientists, using magnetic instruments (magnetometers) adapted from airborne devices
developed during World War II to detect submarines, began recognizing odd magnetic variations across the ocean
floor. This finding, though unexpected, was not entirely surprising because it was known that basalt -- the iron-rich,
volcanic rock making up the ocean floor-- contains a strongly magnetic mineral (magnetite) and can locally distort
compass readings.
This distortion was recognized by Icelandic mariners as early as the late 18th century. More important, because the
presence of magnetite gives the basalt measurable magnetic properties, these newly discovered magnetic
variations provided another means to study the deep ocean floor.
Paleomagnetists (those who study the Earth's ancient magnetic field) began to recognize that rocks generally belong
to two groups according to their magnetic properties.
• Normal polarity, which is characterized by the magnetic minerals in the rock having the same polarity as that of
the Earth's present magnetic field. This would result in the north end of the rock's "compass needle" pointing
toward magnetic north.
• Reversed polarity, is indicated by a polarity alignment opposite to that of the Earth's present magnetic field. In
this case, the north end of the rock's compass needle would point south.
How could this be?
This answer lies in the magnetite in volcanic rock. Grains of magnetite -- behaving like little magnets -- can align
themselves with the orientation of the Earth's magnetic field.
When magma (molten rock containing minerals and gases) cools to form solid volcanic rock, the alignment
of the magnetite grains is "locked in," recording the Earth's magnetic orientation or polarity (normal
or reversed) at the time of cooling.
Paleomagnetists (those who study the Earth's ancient magnetic field) began to recognize that rocks generally belong
to two groups according to their magnetic properties.
• Normal polarity, which is characterized by the magnetic minerals in the rock having the same polarity as that of
the Earth's present magnetic field. This would result in the north end of the rock's "compass needle" pointing
toward magnetic north.
• Reversed polarity, is indicated by a polarity alignment opposite to that of the Earth's present magnetic field. In
this case, the north end of the rock's compass needle would point south.
Magnetic striping and polar reversals (continued)
As more and more of the seafloor was mapped during the 1950s, the magnetic variations turned out not to be
random or isolated occurrences, but instead revealed recognizable patterns.
When these magnetic patterns were mapped over a wide region, the ocean floor
showed a zebra-like pattern. Alternating stripes of magnetically different rock
were laid out in rows on either side of the mid-ocean ridge: one stripe with
normal polarity and the adjoining stripe with reversed polarity.
The overall pattern, defined by these alternating bands of normally and reversely polarized rock, became known as
magnetic striping.
A theoretical Model of the Formation of Magnetic
Striping.
New oceanic crust forming continuously at the crest of the
mid-ocean ridge cools and becomes increasingly older as it
moves away from the ridge crest with seafloor spreading (see
text):
a. the spreading ridge about 5 million years ago
b. about 2 to 3 million years ago
c. present-day
The observation that oceanic crust is much younger than continental crust was important in developing the
theory of plate tectonics – it meant that oceanic crust forms at the mid-oceanic ridges and is consumed, or
subducted into the mantle, at the trenches. The mid-oceanic ridges are divergent plate boundaries. The trenches
are convergent plate boundaries.
Magnetic striping and polar reversals (continued)
Age of the Ocean’s Crust
This image shows the magnetic stripes on the seafloor which correspond to the age of the oceanic crust.
• Red represents the newest crust, which forms at mid-oceanic ridges (divergent plate boundaries).
• Blue represents the oldest seafloor which is Jurassic in age.
The newest crust created at the mid-oceanic ridges, shown here as dark red. The oldest seafloor is Jurassic, shown as dark
blue (USGS).
Seafloor Spreading & Recycling of Oceanic Crust
The discovery of magnetic striping naturally prompted more questions:
How does the magnetic striping pattern form?
And why are the stripes symmetrical around the crests of the mid-ocean ridges?
These questions could not be answered without also knowing the significance of these ridges. In 1961, scientists began
to theorize that mid-ocean ridges mark structurally weak zones where the ocean floor was being ripped in two
lengthwise along the ridge crest. New magma from deep within the Earth rises easily through these weak zones and
eventually erupts along the crest of the ridges to create new oceanic crust.
This process, later called seafloor spreading, operating over many millions of years has built the 50,000 km-long
system of mid-ocean ridges. This hypothesis was supported by several lines of evidence:
(1) At or near the crest of the ridge, the rocks are very young, and they become progressively older away from
the ridge crest.
(2) The youngest rocks at the ridge crest always have present-day (normal) polarity.
(3) Stripes of rock parallel to the ridge crest alternated in magnetic polarity (normal-reversed-normal, etc.),
suggesting that the Earth's magnetic field has flipped many times.
By explaining both the magnetic striping and the construction of the mid-ocean ridge system, the
seafloor spreading hypothesis quickly gained converts and represented another major advance in the
development of the plate-tectonics theory. Furthermore, the oceanic crust now came to be appreciated as a
natural recording of the history of the reversals in the Earth's magnetic field.
Seafloor Spreading & Recycling of Oceanic Crust
Additional evidence of seafloor spreading came from an unexpected source: petroleum exploration.
In the years following World War II, continental oil reserves were being depleted rapidly and the search for offshore
oil was on. To conduct offshore exploration, oil companies built ships equipped with a special drilling rig and the
capacity to carry many kilometers of drill pipe. This basic idea later was adapted in constructing a research vessel,
named the Glomar Challenger, designed specifically for marine geology studies, including the collection of drill-core
samples from the deep ocean floor.
When the ages of the samples were determined by paleontologic and isotopic dating
studies, they provided the clinching evidence that established the seafloor
spreading hypothesis as an integral part of the theory of plate tectonics.
The Glomar Challenger
This ship was the first research vessel specifically
designed in the late 1960s for the purpose of drilling
into and taking core samples from the deep ocean
floor.
In 1968, the vessel embarked on a year-long
scientific expedition, crisscrossing the Mid-Atlantic
Ridge between South America and Africa and
drilling core samples at specific locations.
The JOIDES Resolution
This vessel is the deep-sea drilling ship of the 1990s
(JOIDES= Joint Oceanographic Institutions for Deep Earth
Sampling).
This ship, which carries more than 9,000 m of drill pipe, is
capable of more precise positioning and deeper drilling than
the Glomar Challenger. (Photographs courtesy of Ocean Drilling
Program, Texas A & M University.)
Seafloor Spreading & Recycling of Oceanic Crust
Seafloor Spreading & Recycling of Oceanic Crust
It was Harry H. Hess, a Princeton University geologist and a Naval Reserve Rear Admiral, and Robert S. Dietz, a
scientist with the U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey who first coined the term seafloor spreading. Dietz and Hess were
among the small handful who really understood the broad implications of sea floor spreading, and were the first to
publish papers proposing Plate Tectonics. They were very intrigued by the question:
How can new crust be continuously added along the oceanic ridges without
increasing the size of the Earth?
If the Earth's crust was expanding along the oceanic ridges, Hess reasoned, it must be consumed elsewhere. He
suggested that:
New oceanic crust continuously
spread away from the ridges in a
conveyor belt-like motion. Many
millions of years later, the oceanic
crust eventually descends into the
oceanic trenches.
Trenches are very deep, narrow depressions along the rim
of the Pacific Ocean Basin. According to Hess, the Atlantic
Ocean was expanding while the Pacific Ocean was
shrinking.
As old oceanic crust was consumed in the trenches, new
magma rose and erupted along the spreading ridges to
form new crust.
Harry Hess
Harry Hess, as he explained the Ocean crust cycle
from spreading rift to subduction, 1968 (Princeton
University).
Seafloor Spreading & Recycling of Oceanic Crust
In effect, the ocean basins were perpetually being "recycled," with the creation of new crust and the destruction of
old oceanic lithosphere occurring simultaneously.
Thus, Hess' ideas neatly explained:
1) Why the Earth does not get bigger with sea floor spreading.
2) Why there is so little sediment accumulation on the ocean floor.
3) Why oceanic rocks are much younger than continental rocks.
Harry Hess
(1906-1969) In World War II, he took part in four major landings in the
Pacific as commander of the attack transport U.S.S. Cape Johnson.
Utilizing the transport's sounding gear, he was able to take thousands of
miles of depth soundings as part of his life-long study of the ocean floor that
eventually led him to propose “Plate Tectonics” in 1962.
In a faculty memorial his Princeton colleagues observed:
“Harry Hess had a deep, almost a religious, reverence for the awesome
order of the universe. He possessed that combination of a driving urge to
discover truth and a profound humility before the vast truths yet unknown
which is the mark of the truly creative scholar (Princeton University)”.
Robert Dietz
Dietz served as an adjunct professor at the Scripps Institution of Oceanography from 1950-1963, coincident with his service
at the Naval Electronics Laboratory, 1946-1963. At his home at La Jolla Shores he hosted discussions among marine
geologists and graduate students.
On January 23, 1960, Dietz supervised the deepest dive, 35,800 feet, almost seven miles to the seafloor in the Challenger
Deep, a location southwest of Guam. Dietz coauthored a book describing this feat entitled, Seven Miles Down: The Story of
the Bathyscaph TRIESTE. (New York: Putnam, 1961).
He later worked at the U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey in Washington, DC., and retired from Arizona State University in
1985. He passed away in 1995. He is remembered for his rigorous science in diverse fields.
Concentration of Earthquakes
During the 20th century, improvements in seismic instrumentation and greater use of earthquake-recording
instruments (seismographs) worldwide enabled scientists to learn that earthquakes tend to be concentrated in
certain areas, most notably along the oceanic trenches and spreading ridges.
By the late 1920s, seismologists were beginning to identify several prominent earthquake zones
parallel to the trenches that typically were inclined 40-60° from the horizontal and extended several hundred
kilometers into the Earth. These zones later became known as Wadati-Benioff zones, or simply Benioff zones, in
honor of the seismologists who first recognized them, Kiyoo Wadati of Japan and Hugo Benioff of Cal Tech in the
United States.
Earthquake Zones (1954)
As early as the 1920’s , scientists noted that
earthquakes are concentrated in very specific
narrow zones (see text). In 1954, a French
seismologist J.P. Rothé . published this map
showing the concentration of earthquakes along the
zones indicated by dots and cross-hatched areas
(Published by French seismologist J.P. Rothé . Original
illustration reproduced with permission of the Royal Society
of London).
Concentration of Earthquakes
Today, we also know them as subduction zones. The study of global seismicity greatly advanced in the 1960s with
the establishment of the Worldwide Standardized Seismograph Network (WWSSN) to monitor the compliance of the
1963 treaty banning above-ground testing of nuclear weapons. The much-improved data from the WWSSN
instruments allowed seismologists to map precisely the zones of earthquake concentration worldwide.
But what was the significance of the connection between earthquakes and
oceanic trenches and ridges?
The recognition of such a connection helped confirm the seafloor-spreading hypothesis by pin-pointing the zones
where Hess had predicted oceanic crust is being generated (along the ridges) and the zones where oceanic lithosphere
sinks back into the mantle (beneath the trenches).
The locations of earthquakes closely matches the locations of tectonic plate boundaries.
Click for Current Quakes in Google Earth
Concentration of Earthquakes

Plate Tectonics part 2

There are four types of plate
boundaries:
1) Divergent boundaries -- where
new crust is generated as the
plates pull away from each other.
2) Convergent boundaries -- where
crust is destroyed as one plate
dives under another.
3) Transform boundaries -- where
crust is neither produced nor
destroyed as the plates slide
horizontally past each other.
4) Plate boundary zones -- broad
belts in which boundaries are not
well defined and the effects of
plate interaction are unclear.
Understanding Plate Motions
Scientists now have a fairly good understanding of how the plates move and how such movements relate to earthquake
activity. Most movement occurs along narrow zones at plate boundaries, where the results of plate-tectonic forces are most
evident.
Artistic Cross Section of the Main Types of Plate Boundaries
Notice that 3 of the 4 plate boundary types (see text) are shown. East African Rift
Zone is a good example of a continental rift zone (Cross section by José F. Vigil from This
Dynamic Planet -- a wall map produced jointly by the U.S. Geological Survey, the Smithsonian
Institution, and the U.S. Naval Research Laboratory.)
Click To Play Video
Understanding plate motions (continued)
Divergent Boundaries
Divergent boundaries occur along spreading centers where plates
are moving apart and new crust is created by magma rising up
from the mantle.
Picture two giant conveyor belts, facing each
other but slowly moving in opposite directions
as they transport newly formed oceanic crust
away from the ridge crest.
Perhaps the best known of the divergent boundaries is the MidAtlantic Ridge. This submerged mountain range, which extends from
the Arctic Ocean to beyond the southern tip of Africa, is but one
segment of the global mid-ocean ridge system that encircles the
Earth. The rate of spreading along the Mid-Atlantic Ridge averages
about 2.5 centimeters per year (cm/yr), or 25 km in a million years.
Mid-Atlantic Ridge
 This Ridge splits nearly the entire Atlantic Ocean
north to south, is probably the best-known and moststudied example of a divergent-plate
boundary.(Illustration adapted from the map This Dynamic
Planet.)
Divergent Boundaries
This rate may seem slow by human standards, but because this process has been going on for millions of years, it has
resulted in plate movement of thousands of kilometers. Seafloor spreading over the past 100 to 200 million years has
caused the Atlantic Ocean to grow from a tiny inlet of water between the continents of Europe, Africa, and the
Americas into the vast ocean that exists today.
The volcanic country of Iceland, which straddles the MidAtlantic Ridge, offers scientists a natural laboratory for
studying on land the processes that are also occurring along
the submerged parts of a spreading ridge.
Iceland is splitting along the spreading center between the
North American and Eurasian Plates, as North America
moves westward relative to Eurasia.
More generally speaking, any fault at which the rock above the fault
moves downward, resulting in extension, is called a normal fault.
Normal faults are common wherever the crust is extending,
including at divergent plate boundaries.
Divergent boundaries are characterized by basaltic,
generally non-explosive volcanism and shallow
earthquakes of moderate magnitude. The
shallowness of the quakes increases their destructive
power.
Map of the Mid-Atlantic Ridge
The Ridge splits Iceland and separates the
North American and Eurasian Plates. The
map also shows Reykjavik, the capital of
Iceland, the Thingvellir area, and the
locations of some of Iceland's active
volcanoes (red triangles), including Krafla.
Click to Play Video
Divergent Boundaries
The consequences of plate movement are easy to see around Krafla Volcano, in the northeastern part of Iceland.
Here, existing ground cracks have widened and new ones appear every few months.
From 1975 to 1984, numerous episodes of rifting (surface cracking and extension) took place along the Krafla
fissure zone. Some of these rifting events were accompanied by volcanic activity; the ground would gradually rise 1-2
m before abruptly dropping, signaling an impending eruption. Between 1975 and 1984, the displacements caused by
rifting totaled about 7 m.
Divergent Boundaries
Lava Fountains
These fountains are spouting from eruptive
fissures during the October 1980 eruption of
Krafla (Iceland) Volcano.
(Photograph by Gudmundur E. Sigvaldason, Nordic
Volcanological Institute, Reykjavik, Iceland.)
Iceland
This Google Earth image shows Iceland straddling the mid-Atlantic ridge (the red line). This provides an on-land look at a
divergent plate boundary. It is characterized by normal faults, fissures, and active basaltic volcanoes.
Divergent Boundaries
In East Africa, spreading processes have already torn Saudi Arabia away from the rest of the African continent,
forming the Red Sea. The actively splitting African Plate and the Arabian Plate meet in what geologists call a triple
junction, where the Red Sea meets the Gulf of Aden. A new spreading center may be developing under Africa along
the East African Rift Zone.
Map of East Africa
Historically active volcanoes are shown as (red triangles)
and the Afar Triangle is shaded and in the center of
image.
The Triangle is a “triple point” where three plates are
pulling away from one another: the Arabian Plate, and
the two parts of the African Plate (the Nubian and the
Somalian).
Divergent Boundaries
When the continental crust stretches beyond
its limits, tension cracks begin to appear on
the Earth's surface. Magma rises and squeezes
through the widening cracks, sometimes to
erupt and form volcanoes.
The rising magma, whether or not it
erupts, puts more pressure on the
crust to produce additional fractures
and, ultimately, the rift zone.
Divergent Boundaries
Aerial view of the area around Thingvellir,
Iceland
This image shows a fissure zone (in shadow) that is an
on-land exposure of the Mid-Atlantic Ridge. To the
right of the fissure, the North American Plate is
pulling westward away from the Eurasian Plate (left of
fissure).
This photograph encompasses the historical tourist
area of Thingvellir, the site of Iceland's first
parliament, called the Althing, founded around the
year A.D. 930.
Large building (upper center) is a hotel for visitors.
(Photograph by Oddur Sigurdsson, National Energy Authority,
Iceland.)
East Africa may be the site of the Earth's next
major ocean. Plate interactions in the region provide
scientists an opportunity to study first hand how the
Atlantic may have begun to form about 200 million years
ago.
Geologists believe that, if spreading continues, the three
plates that meet at the edge of the present-day African
continent will separate completely, allowing the Indian
Ocean to flood the area and making the easternmost
corner of Africa (the Horn of Africa) a large island.
Active Lava Lake in Ethiopia
Helicopter view (in February 1994) within the summit
crater of 'Erta 'Ale, one of the active volcanoes in the
East African Rift Zone.
Two helmeted, red-suited volcanologists -- observing the
activity from the crater rim -- provide scale.
Red color within the crater shows where molten lava is
breaking through the lava lake's solidified, black crust.
(Photograph by Jacques Durieux, Groupe Volcans Actifs).
Oldoinyo Lengai, active volcano in East
African Rift Zone.
Volcano erupting explosively in 1966.
(Photograph by Gordon Davies, courtesy of Celia
Nyamweru, St. Lawrence University, Canton, New York.)
Divergent Boundaries
View northeastward along the East African rift in Ethiopia (Google Earth).
lava flows
lava flows
Divergent Boundaries
Convergent Boundaries
Convergent Boundary in Google Earth
Artistic Cross-Section of a Convergent
Boundary
Destruction of crust takes place along convergent
plate boundaries where plates are moving toward
each other, and sometimes one plate sinks (is
subducted) under another.(USGS)
The size of the Earth has not changed significantly during
the past 600 million years, and very likely not since shortly
after its formation 4.6 billion years ago. The Earth's
unchanging size implies that the crust must be destroyed at
about the same rate as it is being created, as Harry Hess
surmised.
Such destruction (recycling) of crust takes place along
convergent boundaries where plates are moving toward
each other, and sometimes one plate sinks (is subducted)
under another. The location where sinking of a plate occurs
is called a subduction zone.
The type of convergence -- called by some a very
slow "collision" -- that takes place between plates
depends on the kind of lithosphere involved.
Convergence can occur between an oceanic and a largely
continental plate, or between two largely oceanic plates, or
between two largely continental plates. More generally
speaking, any fault at which one side moves under the other
is called a reverse or thrust fault.
Off the coast of South America along the Peru-Chile trench, the oceanic Nazca plate is pushing into and being
subducted under the continental part of the South American plate. In turn, the overriding South American plate
is being lifted up and invaded by volcanoes, creating the towering Andes mountains, the backbone of the
continent.
Convergent boundaries are characterized by explosive volcanism and strong earthquakes. Such
earthquakes are often accompanied by uplift or subsidence of the land by as much as a few meters.
Oceanic-continental Convergence
If by magic we could pull a plug and drain the Pacific Ocean, we would see a most amazing sight -- a number of
long narrow, curving trenches thousands of kilometers long and 8 to 10 km deep cutting into the ocean floor.
Trenches are the deepest parts of the ocean floor and are created by subduction where the
oceanic plate is bent downward to subduct into the mangle.
Artistic Cross-Section of a
Convergent Boundary
Notice that at this type of
boundary, oceanic crust is
colliding with continental crust
USGS).
Click to Play Video
Oceanic-continental Convergence
On May 22, 1960, the strongest earthquake recorded so far struck the coast of southern Chile, where the Nazca
plate subducts beneath the South American plate. At magnitude 9.5, the quake had unimaginable power.
It lifted an area the size of California up to 9 meters, and triggered the eruption of two volcanoes. It also sent a
tsunami across the Pacific that devastated coasts and harbors in Chile, Hawaii, and Japan.
Andes Mountains
The convergence of the Nazca and South American Plates has deformed and pushed up limestone
strata to form towering peaks of the Andes, as seen here in the Pachapaqui mining area in Peru.
(Photograph by George Ericksen, USGS.). Other Andes peaks, some of which are over 20,000 feet high, are volcanoes.
Oceanic-continental Convergence
Nazca Plate South American Plate
Nazca Subduction Zone
This image from Google Earth shows the Nazca plate subducting the South American plate, creating the Andes volcanic arc.
Distant volcanoes are not shown.
Oceanic-continental Convergence
Oceanic-continental convergence also sustains many of the Earth's active volcanoes, such as those in the Andes
and the Cascade Range in the Pacific Northwest. The eruptive activity is clearly associated with subduction,
triggered when water from the subducted slab triggers melting at about 100 km depth. This trigger is called
hydration melting.
Volcanic Arcs and Oceanic
Trenches
Partly encircling the Pacific Basin
form the so-called Ring of Fire, a
zone of frequent earthquakes and
volcanic eruptions.
The trenches are shown in bluegreen. The volcanic island arcs,
although not labelled, are parallel
to, and always landward of, the
trenches.
For example, the island arc
associated with the Aleutian Trench
is represented by the long chain of
volcanoes that make up the Aleutian
Islands.
Oceanic-continental Convergence
Juan de Fuca Plate
North
American
Plate
Oregon
Washington
California
Juan de Fuca subduction
The Juan de Fuca plate subducts under the North American plate in the Pacific Northwest. Some distant volcanoes
in Washington are not shown.
Oceanic-continental Convergence

Plate Tectonics part 3

Oceanic-oceanic Convergence
As with oceanic-continental convergence, when two oceanic plates converge, one is usually subducted under the
other, and in the process a trench is formed. The Marianas Trench (paralleling the Mariana Islands), for example,
marks where the fast-moving Pacific Plate converges against the slower moving Philippine Plate.
The Challenger Deep, at the southern end of the Marianas Trench, plunges deeper into the
Earth's interior (nearly 11,000 m) than Mount Everest, the world's tallest mountain, rises
above sea level (about 8,854 m).
One of the pioneers of Plate Tectonics, Robert Dietz, led an expedition that sent a specialized, manned submarine to
the bottom of the trench. It remains the deepest dive to this day.
Oceanic-Oceanic Convergence
This artistic cross-section shows the tectonic process
that created the Challenger Deep, the deepest part of
Earth’s ocean.
As with oceanic-continental convergence, when two
oceanic plates converge, one is usually subducted
under the other, and in the process a trench is
formed. (USGS)
Oceanic-oceanic Convergence
Subduction processes in oceanic-oceanic plate convergence also result in the formation of volcanoes. Over millions of
years, the erupted lava and volcanic debris pile up on the ocean floor until a submarine volcano rises above sea level
to form an island volcano. Such volcanoes are typically strung out in chains called island arcs. As the name implies,
volcanic island arcs, which closely parallel the trenches, are generally curved.
The trenches are the key to understanding how island arcs such as the Marianas and the
Aleutian Islands have formed and why they experience numerous strong earthquakes.
Magmas that form island arcs are produced by the partial melting of the descending plate and/or the overlying
oceanic lithosphere. The descending plate also provides a source of stress as the two plates interact, leading to
frequent moderate to strong earthquakes.
Eurasian Plate
The Pacific plate subducts under the Eurasian plate in the western Pacific ocean, forming the Marianas trench and island arc.
Pacific Plate
Oceanic-oceanic Convergence
The Pacific plate subducts under the North American plate in the northern Pacific ocean, forming the Aleutian trench and
island arc.
Pacific Plate North American Plate
Alaska
Oceanic-oceanic Convergence
Continental-continental Convergence
The Himalayan mountain range dramatically demonstrates one of the most visible and spectacular consequences of
plate tectonics.
When two continents meet head-on, neither is subducted because the continental rocks are
less dense than the mantle and, like two colliding icebergs, resist sinking.
Instead, the crust tends to buckle and be pushed upward or sideways. The collision of India into Asia 50 million years
ago caused the Indian and Eurasian Plates to crumple up along the collision zone. After the collision, the slow,
continuous convergence of the two plates over millions of years pushed up the Himalayas and the Tibetan Plateau to
their present heights. Most of this growth occurred during the past 10 million years.
Earthquakes in continental-continental convergent zones are shallow and distributed over a wide area, creating
significant seismic hazard. The continental convergent belt extends continuously from Gibraltar through the
Mediterranean; the Zagros Mountains in Iran; the Himalaya of Afghanistan, Pakistan, and China; and into Southeast
Asia.
Continental-Continental Convergence
This artistic cross-section shows the
tectonic process that created the Himalayan
mountain range.
When two continents meet head-on, neither
is subducted because the continental rocks
are less dense than the mantle and, like two
colliding icebergs, resist sinking. (USGS)
Illustration of the collision between the
Indian and Eurasian plates
The collision between the Indian and Eurasian
plates has pushed up the Himalayas and the
Tibetan Plateau.
Continental-continental Convergence
Before and after cartoon Cross Section
Cartoon cross sections showing the meeting of these two plates
before and after their collision. The reference points (small
squares) show the amount of uplift of an imaginary point in
the Earth's crust during this mountain-building process.
The shallow faults shown here create a wide zone of seismic
hazards. Quakes are frequent across the entire width of the
Himalaya.
The Indian plate collides with the Eurasian plate, forming the Himalaya mountains. The collision continues today, and
earthquakes are common.
Eurasian Plate
Himalaya Mountains
Indian Plate
Pakistan
Afghanistan
Continental-continental Convergence
Collision of the Indian plate with the Eurasian plate forms intense folding in Afghanistan, west of the Himalaya. Earthquakes
here are common.
Afghanistan
Continental-continental Convergence
This is the same general area as the last image. Collision of the Indian plate with the Eurasian plate forms intense folding in
Afghanistan, west of the Himalaya. Earthquakes here are common.
Arabian Plate
(continental)
Eurasian Plate
(continental)
Continental-continental Convergence
Transform Boundaries
The zone between two plates sliding horizontally past one
another is called a transform-fault boundary, or simply a
transform boundary.
The concept of transform faults originated with Canadian
geophysicist J. Tuzo Wilson, who proposed that these large
faults or fracture zones connect two spreading centers
(divergent plate boundaries) or, less commonly, trenches
(convergent plate boundaries). Most transform faults are
found on the ocean floor.
Transform faults commonly offset the active
spreading ridges, producing zig-zag plate margins,
and are generally defined by shallow earthquakes.
Watch J. Tuzo Wilson Discuss
Transform Faults (YouTube)
Fracture Zones and the San Andreas Fault
The San Andreas is one of the few transform faults
exposed on land.
The Blanco, Mendocino, Murray, and Molokai
fracture zones, are some of the many fracture zones
(transform faults) that scar the ocean floor and
offset ridges (USGS).
Transform Boundaries
A few occur on land, for example the San Andreas fault zone
in California. This transform fault connects the East Pacific
Rise, a divergent boundary to the south, with the South Gorda
-- Juan de Fuca – Explorer Ridge, another divergent
boundary to the north.
Any fault at which the two sides move
horizontally past each other is called a strikeslip fault.
Transform faults are strike-slip faults that are located at a plate
boundary. Transform boundaries are characterized by shallow
to moderately deep earthquakes of moderate to large
magnitude. Generally, no volcanism is associated with
transform boundaries.
 Land on the west side of the fault zone (on the Pacific Plate) is
moving in a northwesterly direction relative to the land on the
east side of the fault zone (on the North American Plate).
San Andreas Fault
This aerial view of the fault shows it
slicing through the Carrizo Plain in the
Temblor Range east of the city of San
Luis Obispo and west of Bakersfield.
(Photograph by Robert E. Wallace, USGS.)
The San Andreas fault zone, which is about 1,300 km
long and in places tens of kilometers wide, slices through
two thirds of the length of California. Along it, the Pacific
Plate has been grinding horizontally past the North
American Plate for 10 million years, at an average rate of
about 5 cm/yr.
Tour the San Andreas
The San Andreas fault is a transform boundary between the Pacific and North American plates. It joins the East Pacific Rise in
the south to the faults bounding the Juan de Fuca plate to the north.
North American Plate
Transform Boundaries
Juan de Fuca plate
Transform Boundaries
Oceanic fracture zones are ocean-floor valleys that horizontally offset spreading ridges; some of
these zones are hundreds to thousands of kilometers long and as much as 8 km deep. Examples of
these large scars include the Clarion, Molokai, and Pioneer fracture zones in the Northeast Pacific off
the coast of California and Mexico.
These zones are presently inactive, but the offsets of the patterns of magnetic striping provide
evidence that they began as transform faults.
The San Andreas fault has offset Wallace Creek by over 100 meters (BYUI).
North American Plate
Pacific Plate
creek continues over here
Transform Boundaries
Plate-boundary Zones
Not all plate boundaries are as simple as the main types
discussed above.
In some regions, the boundaries are not well
defined because the plate-movement
deformation occurring there extends over a
broad belt (called a plate-boundary zone).
One of these zones marks the Mediterranean-Alpine
region between the Eurasian and African Plates, within
which several smaller fragments of plates (microplates)
have been recognized.
Because plate-boundary zones involve at least two large
plates and one or more microplates caught up between
them, they tend to have complicated geological
structures and earthquake patterns.
An example of an indistinct, or diffuse, plate
boundary is the one between the North American and
Eurasian plates, where no distinct fault or other
structure is present to define a boundary. Consequently,
the boundary between these plates is drawn in different
places on different maps.
Easter Island Statue
One of the mysterious, imposing stone monoliths --
some standing 5 m tall and weighing 14 tons -- on
Easter Island (Chile), carved by ancient
Polynesians out of volcanic rock.
Easter Island, which lies on the Nazca Plate close to
the East Pacific Rise, is moving eastward toward
South America by seafloor spreading at the fastest
rate known in the world (see text). (Photograph by
Carlos Capurro, U.S. Embassy, Santiago, Chile.)
Rates of Motion
We can measure how fast tectonic plates are moving today, but there is still one important question, how do scientists
know what the rates of plate movement have been over geologic time?
The two main ways that plate movements are calculated include:
1) Magnetic Striping:
Ocean floor magnetic striping records the flips in the Earth’s magnetic field.
When scientists know the duration of a reversal, they can calculate the average rate of
plate movement during a given time span.
These average rates of plate separations based on magnetic striping records can range widely. For
example:
• The Arctic Ridge has the slowest rate (less than 2.5 cm/yr).
• The East Pacific Rise near Easter Island, in the South Pacific about 3,400 km west of Chile, has the fastest
rate (more than 15 cm/yr).
2) Geology Mapping:
Evidence of past rates of plate movement also can be obtained from geologic mapping studies.
If a rock formation of known age can be matched with the same formation on the other
side of a boundary, measuring the offset can give us an estimate of the average rate of
plate motion.
Scientists look for formations with distinctive composition, structure, or fossils. This simple but effective
technique has been used to determine the rates of plate motion at divergent boundaries, for example the
Mid-Atlantic Ridge, and transform boundaries, such as the San Andreas Fault.
Rates of Motion
Current plate movement is tracked directly by means of ground-based or space-based geodetic measurements.
Geodesy is the science of the size and shape of the Earth.
Ground-based measurements are taken with conventional but very precise ground-surveying techniques, using laserelectronic instruments. However, because plate motions are global in scale, they are best measured by satellite-based
methods. The late 1970s witnessed the rapid growth of space geodesy, a term applied to space-based techniques for
taking precise, repeated measurements of carefully chosen points on the Earth's surface separated by hundreds to
thousands of kilometers.
GPS Ground Receiver
This image shows the reciever set up on the
flank of Augustine Volcano (Cook Inlet,
Alaska) – recording the signals sent by four
or more of the orbiting GPS satellites.
(Photograph by Jerry Svarc, USGS.)
The three most commonly used space-geodetic techniques -- very long baseline interferometry (VLBI), satellite laser
ranging (SLR), and the Global Positioning System (GPS) -- are based on technologies developed for military and
aerospace research, notably radio astronomy and satellite tracking.
Among the three techniques, to date the GPS has been the most useful for
studying the Earth's crustal movements.
Rates of Motion
These measurements also confirm related geologic concepts including radiometric dates of rocks, movement on
faults, and seafloor spreading.
Artist's Conception of a GPS Satellite in
Orbit.
(Illustration courtesy of NASA).
Twenty-one satellites are currently in orbit 20,000 km
above the Earth as part of the NavStar system of the U.S.
Department of Defense. These satellites continuously
transmit radio signals back to Earth
To determine its precise position on Earth (longitude,
latitude, elevation), each GPS ground site must
simultaneously receive signals from at least four satellites,
recording the exact time and location of each satellite
when its signal was received. By repeatedly measuring
distances between specific points, geologists can
determine if there has been active movement along faults
or between plates. The separations between GPS sites are
already being measured regularly around the world.
By monitoring the interaction between the Pacific Plate
and the surrounding, largely continental plates, scientists
hope to learn more about the events building up to
earthquakes and volcanic eruptions in the circum-Pacific
Ring of Fire. Space-geodetic data have already confirmed
that the rates and direction of plate movement, averaged
over several years, compare well with rates and direction
of plate movement averaged over millions of years.
GPS has confirmed the major premise of the theory of plate tectonics – that the lithospheric
plates are indeed moving. 

Plate Tectonics Part 4
The vast majority of earthquakes and volcanic eruptions occur near
plate boundaries, but there are some exceptions. For example, the
Hawaiian Islands, which are entirely of volcanic origin, have formed
in the middle of the Pacific Ocean more than 3,200 km from the nearest
plate boundary.
How do the Hawaiian Islands and other volcanoes
that form in the interior of plates fit into the platetectonics picture?
“Hotspots”: Mantle thermal plumes
Space Shuttle photograph of the
Hawaiian Islands
The image shows southernmost part of
the long volcanic trail of the "Hawaiian
hotspot" (see text).
Kauai is in the lower right corner (edge)
and the Big Island of Hawaii in the upper
left corner. Note the curvature of the
Earth (top edge). (Photograph courtesy of
NASA).
In 1963, J. Tuzo Wilson, the Canadian geophysicist who discovered
transform faults, came up with an ingenious idea that became known
as the "hotspot" theory. Wilson noted that in certain locations
around the world, such as Hawaii, volcanism has been active for very
long periods of time.
This could only happen, he reasoned, if relatively small, long-lasting,
and exceptionally hot regions -- called hotspots -- existed below the
plates that would provide localized sources of high heat energy
(thermal plumes) to sustain volcanism.
Specifically, Wilson hypothesized that the distinctive linear shape of
the Hawaiian Island-Emperor Seamounts chain resulted from the
Pacific Plate moving over a deep, stationary thermal plume in the
mantle, located beneath the present-day position of the Island of
Hawaii.
Hotspots
Heat from this plume produced a persistent source of
magma by partly melting the overriding Pacific Plate. The
magma, which is lighter than the surrounding solid rock,
then rises through the mantle and crust to erupt onto the
seafloor, forming an active seamount. Over time, countless
eruptions cause the seamount to grow until it finally
emerges above sea level to form an island volcano. Wilson
suggested that continuing plate movement eventually
carries the island beyond the hotspot, cutting it off from
the magma source, and volcanism ceases.
As one island volcano becomes extinct, another
develops over the hotspot, and the cycle is
repeated.
This process of volcano growth and death, over many
millions of years, has left a long trail of volcanic islands and
seamounts across the Pacific Ocean floor. According to
Wilson's hotspot theory, the volcanoes of the Hawaiian
chain should get progressively older and become more
eroded the farther they travel beyond the hotspot.
Artistic drawing of the Hawaiian
“Hot Spot”
Artist's conception of the movement of the
Pacific Plate over the fixed Hawaiian "Hot
Spot," illustrating the formation of the
Hawaiian Ridge-Emperor Seamount
Chain.
(Modified from a drawing provided by Maurice
Krafft, Centre de Volcanologie, France and
reproduced with permission of the Canadian
Journal of Physics.)
Hotspots
The oldest volcanic rocks on Kauai, the northwesternmost inhabited Hawaiian island, are about 5.5 million years old
and are deeply eroded. By comparison, on the "Big Island“ of Hawaii -- southeasternmost in the chain and
presumably still positioned over the hotspot -- the oldest exposed rocks are less than 0.7 million years old and new
volcanic rock is continually being formed.
The possibility that the Hawaiian Islands become younger to the southeast was suspected by the ancient Hawaiians,
long before any scientific studies were done. During their voyages, sea-faring Hawaiians noticed the differences in
erosion, soil formation, and vegetation and recognized that the islands to the northwest (Niihau and Kauai) were
older than those to the southeast (Maui and Hawaii). This idea was handed down from generation to generation in
the legends of Pele, the fiery Goddess of Volcanoes.
The mythical flight of Pele from Kauai to Hawaii, which alludes to the eternal struggle between the growth of
volcanic islands from eruptions and their later erosion by ocean waves, is consistent with geologic evidence obtained
centuries later that clearly shows the islands becoming younger from northwest to southeast.
Hawaiian Island Formation (Wilson’s
Proposal)
Wilson's original diagram (slightly modified),
published in 1963, to show his proposed origin of
the Hawaiian Islands. (Reproduced with permission of
the Canadian Journal of Physics.)
Pele originally lived on Kauai. When her older sister Namakaokahai, the Goddess of the Sea,
attacked her, Pele fled to the Island of Oahu. When she was forced by Namakaokahai to flee again,
Pele moved southeast to Maui and finally to Hawaii, where she now lives in the Halemaumau
Crater at the summit of Kilauea Volcano.
The image below is a Google Earth image of the Hawaiian Islands. As the Pacific plate moves northwestward, it
carries older hot spot volcanoes in that direction. The current hot spot is located at the island of Hawaii (the “Big
Island”). The oldest volcanic rocks on Kauai, the northwestern most inhabited Hawaiian island, are about 5.5 million
years old.
Hotspots
By comparison, on the "Big Island“ of Hawaii -- southeastern most in the chain and presumably still positioned over
the hotspot -- the oldest exposed rocks are less than 0.7 million years old and new volcanic rock is continually being
formed.
Pacific Plate
Hawaii
Worldwide Hot Spots
World map showing the locations of selected prominent hotspots; which appear as orange circles. Map
“explanation” explains other markings such as the delineation of divergent, convergent, and transform plate
boundaries and plate boundary zones. (Modified from the map This Dynamic Planet, USGS).
Hotspots
Although Hawaii is perhaps the best known hotspot, others are thought to exist beneath the oceans and
continents. More than a hundred hotspots beneath the Earth's crust have been active during the past 10 million
years. Most of these are located under plate interiors (for example, the African Plate), but some occur near
diverging plate boundaries. Some are concentrated near the mid-oceanic ridge system, such as beneath Iceland,
the Azores, and the Galapagos Islands.
Hotspots
Authors' Note: Since this booklet's publication in 1996, vigorous scientific
debate has ensued regarding volcanism at "hotspots." New studies suggest that
hotspots are neither deep phenomena nor "fixed" in position over geologic time,
as assumed in the popular plume model. See http://www.mantleplumes.org
Mauna Loa
Snow-capped 4,169-m-high Mauna Loa Volcano, Island of Hawaii, seen from the USGS
Hawaiian Volcano Observatory. Built by Hawaiian hotspot volcanism, Mauna Loa -- the largest
mountain in the world -- is a classic example of a shield volcano. (Photograph by Robert I.
Tilling, USGS.)
Hotspots
A few hotspots are thought to exist below the North American Plate. Perhaps the best known is the hotspot presumed
to exist under the continental crust in the region of Yellowstone National Park in northwestern Wyoming. Here are
several calderas (large craters formed by the ground collapse accompanying explosive volcanism) that were produced
by three gigantic eruptions during the past two million years, the most recent of which occurred about 600,000 years
ago.
The thermal energy of the presumed Yellowstone hotspot fuels more than 10,000 hot pools and
springs, geysers (like Old Faithful), and bubbling mudpots (pools of boiling mud).
A large body of magma, capped by a hydrothermal system (a zone of pressurized steam and hot water), still exists
beneath the caldera.
Recent surveys demonstrate that parts of the Yellowstone region rise and fall by as much as 1 cm each year, indicating
the area is still geologically restless. However, these measurable ground movements, which most likely reflect
hydrothermal pressure changes, do not necessarily signal renewed volcanic activity in the area.
lava flows
lava flows
lava flows
The Snake River Plain in Idaho is underlain by volcanic rocks that formed during and after passage of the Yellowstone hot
spot. The hot spot is currently centered under the north end of Yellowstone Lake in the national park. Idaho Wyoming
Hotspots
hot spot
The tectonic plates do not randomly drift or wander about the Earth's surface; they are driven by definite yet unseen
forces. From seismic and other geophysical evidence and laboratory experiments, scientists generally agree with Harry
Hess‘ theory that the plate-driving force is the slow movement of hot, softened mantle that lies below the rigid plates.
What drives the plates?
Although scientists can neither precisely
describe nor fully understand the forces,
most believe that the relatively shallow
forces driving the lithospheric plates are
coupled with forces originating much
deeper in the Earth.
This idea was first considered in the 1930s by
Arthur Holmes, the English geologist who later
influenced Harry Hess‘ thinking about seafloor
spreading. Holmes speculated that the circular
motion of the mantle carried the continents
along in much the same way as a conveyor belt.
However, at the time that Wegener proposed his
theory of continental drift, most scientists still
believed the Earth was a solid, motionless body.
We now know better.
Sketch of Mantle Convection
Image shows two proposed mantle convection hypothesis.
The top one illustrates upper mantle convection while the
bottom drawing illustrates convection cells that reach much
farther into the Earth’s interior.
As J. Tuzo Wilson eloquently stated in 1968, "The earth, instead of appearing as an inert statue, is a living,
mobile thing." Both the Earth's surface and its interior are in motion. Below the lithospheric plates, at some
depth the mantle is plastic and can flow, albeit slowly, in response to steady forces applied for long periods
of time. Just as a solid metal like steel, when exposed to heat and pressure, can be softened and take
different shapes, so too can solid rock in the mantle when subjected to heat and pressure in the Earth's
interior over millions of years.”
The mobile rock beneath the rigid plates is thought to be moving in a circular manner somewhat like a pot
of thick soup when heated to boiling. The heated soup rises to the surface, spreads and begins to cool, and
then sinks back to the bottom of the pot where it is reheated and rises again. This cycle is repeated over and
over to generate what scientists call a convection cell or convective flow.
What drives the plates?
What drives the plates?
While convective flow can be observed easily in a pot of boiling soup, the idea of
such a process stirring up the Earth's interior is much more difficult to grasp.
While we know that convective motion in the Earth is much, much slower than
that of boiling soup, many poorly understood questions remain:
How many convection cells exist? Where and how do they originate?
What is their structure?
Convection cannot take place without a source of heat. Heat within the
Earth comes from two main sources: radioactive decay and residual heat.
• Radioactive decay, a spontaneous process that is the basis of
"isotopic clocks“ used to date rocks, involves the loss of particles
from the nucleus of an isotope (the parent) to form an isotope of a
new element (the daughter). The radioactive decay of naturally
occurring chemical elements -- most notably uranium, thorium,
and potassium -- releases energy in the form of heat, which slowly
migrates toward the Earth's surface.
Sketch of Convection in
Water
Cartoon showing convection
cells commonly seen in boiling
water or soup. This analogy,
however, does not take into
account the huge differences in
the size and the flow rates of
these cells (USGS).
• Residual heat is gravitational energy left over from the formation
of the Earth -- 4.6 billion years ago -- by the "falling together" and
compression of cosmic debris.
How and why the escape of interior heat becomes concentrated in
certain regions to form convection cells remains poorly
understood.
What drives the plates?
Until the 1990s, prevailing explanations about what drives plate tectonics have emphasized mantle convection, and
most earth scientists believed that seafloor spreading was the primary mechanism. Cold, denser material convects
downward and hotter, lighter material rises because of gravity; this movement of material is an essential part of
convection.
In addition to the convective forces, some geologists argue that the intrusion of magma into the spreading ridge
provides an additional force (called "ridge push") to propel and maintain plate movement. Thus, subduction
processes are considered to be secondary, a logical but largely passive consequence of seafloor spreading. In recent
years however, the tide has turned.
Most scientists now favor the notion that forces associated with subduction are more
important than seafloor spreading.
Professor Seiya Uyeda (Tokai University, Japan), a world-renowned expert in plate tectonics, concluded in his
keynote address at a major scientific conference on subduction processes in June 1994 that "subduction . . . plays a
more fundamental role than seafloor spreading in shaping the earth's surface features" and "running the plate
tectonic machinery."
The gravity-controlled sinking of a cold, denser oceanic slab into the subduction zone (called "slab pull") -- dragging
the rest of the plate along with it -- is now considered to be the driving force of plate motion.
Conclusion
We know that forces at work deep within the Earth's interior drive plate motion, but we may never fully understand
the details. At present, none of the proposed mechanisms can explain all the facets of plate movement. Because these
forces are buried so deeply, no mechanism can be tested directly and proven beyond reasonable doubt.
The fact that the tectonic plates have moved in the past and are still moving today is beyond dispute, but the details of
why and how they move will continue to challenge scientists far into the future.

Part 5
Plate Tectonics in a Nutshell
In a nutshell, this theory states that the Earth’s outermost layer is fragmented into a dozen or more large and small solid
slabs, called lithospheric plates or tectonic plates, that are moving relative to one another as they ride atop hotter, more
mobile mantle material (called the asthenosphere). The average rates of motion of these restless plates—in the past as well
as the present—range from less than 1 to more than 15 centimeters per year. With some notable exceptions, nearly all the
world’s earthquake and volcanic activity occur along or near boundaries between plates (USGS).
Although this diagram shows the interaction between
continental and oceanic plates, the processes illustrated
also generally apply for the interaction between two
oceanic plates. The next several sides with explain each
number in detail.
The numbers on this diagram correspond to the
numbered explanations that follow.
Plate Tectonics Diagram
1) There are two basic types of lithosphere:
continental and oceanic.
• Continental lithosphere has a low density
because it is made of relatively light-weight
minerals.
• Oceanic lithosphere is denser than continental
lithosphere because it is composed of heavier
minerals.
A plate may be made up entirely of oceanic or
continental lithosphere, but most are partly oceanic
and partly continental.
2) Beneath the lithospheric plates lies the
asthenosphere, a layer of the mantle
composed of denser semi-solid rock. Because the
plates are less dense than the asthenosphere
beneath them, they are floating on top of the
asthenosphere.
3) Deep within the asthenosphere the pressure
and temperature are so high that the rock can
soften. The softened but dense rock can flow
very slowly (think of Silly Putty) over geologic
time.
Where temperature instabilities exist near the
core/mantle boundary, slowly moving
convection currents may form within the solid
asthenosphere.
4) Once formed, convection currents bring hot
material from deeper within the mantle up
toward the surface.
Plate Tectonics Diagram
5) As they rise and approach the surface, convection currents diverge at the base of the lithosphere. The diverging currents
exert a weak tension or “pull” on the solid plate above it. Tension and high heat flow weakens the floating, solid plate,
causing it to break apart. The two sides of the now-split plate then move away from each other, forming a Divergent
Plate Boundary.
6) The space between these diverging plates is filled with magma from below. Contact with seawater cools the magma,
which quickly solidifies, forming new oceanic lithosphere. This continuous process, operating over millions of years, builds a
chain of submarine volcanoes and rift valleys called a Mid-Ocean Ridge or an Oceanic Spreading Ridge.
7) As new molten rock continues to be extruded at the mid-ocean ridge and added to the oceanic plate (6), the older (earlier
formed) part of the plate moves away from the ridge where it was originally created.
Geologists are not sure how deep the oceanic plate sinks before it begins to melt and lose its identity as a rigid slab, but we
do know that it remains solid far beyond depths of 100 km beneath the Earth’s surface.
11) Subduction zones are one type of Convergent Plate Boundary that forms where two plates are moving toward
one another. Notice that although the cool oceanic plate is sinking, the cool but less dense continental plate floats like a cork
on top of the denser asthenosphere.
12) When the subducting oceanic plate sinks deep below the Earth’s surface, the great temperature and pressure at depth
cause the fluids to “sweat” from the sinking plate. The fluids sweated out percolate upward, helping to locally melt the
overlying solid mantle above the subducting plate to form pockets of liquid rock (magma).
Plate Tectonics Diagram 8) As the oceanic plate moves farther and
farther away from the active, hot spreading
ridge, it gradually cools down. The colder the
plate gets, the denser (“heavier”) it becomes.
Eventually, the edge of the plate that is farthest
from the spreading ridges cools so much that it
becomes denser than the asthenosphere
beneath it.
9) As you know, denser materials sink, and
that’s exactly what happens to the oceanic
plate—it starts to sink into the asthenosphere!
Where one plate sinks beneath another a
subduction zone forms.
10) The sinking lead edge of the oceanic plate
actually “pulls” the rest of the plate behind it—
evidence suggests this is the main driving
force of subduction.
13) The newly generated molten mantle
(magma) is less dense than the surrounding
rock, so it rises toward the surface. Most of the
magma cools and solidifies as large bodies of
plutonic (intrusive) rocks far below the
Earth’s surface.
These large bodies, when later exposed by
uplift and erosion, commonly form cores of
many great mountain ranges [such as the
Sierra Nevada (California) or the Andes (South
America)] that are created at convergent plate
boundaries.
14) Some of the molten rock may reach the
Earth’s surface to erupt as the pent-up gas
pressure in the magma is suddenly released,
forming volcanic (extrusive) rocks.
Over time, lava and ash erupted each time
magma reaches the surface will accumulate—
layer upon layer—to construct volcanic
mountain ranges and plateaus, such as the
Cascade Range in the Pacific Northwest, U.S.A.
Plate Tectonics Diagram
Tectonic Tidbits: Miscellaneous Salient Facts
• Present-day continents are much older geologically than the seafloor of present-day ocean basins. Earliest
recognized and dated continental rock (in Australia) was formed about 4.3 billion years ago. In contrast, the
geologically oldest seafloor formed about 180 million years ago.
Why this huge difference in geologic age between continental and oceanic rocks?
Answer: the new crust formed along the ocean ridge crests is carried away by plate movement, and is
ultimately “recycled” deep into the earth along subduction zones. But because continental crust is thicker and
less dense than thinner, younger oceanic, most does not sink deep enough to be recycled and remains largely
preserved on land.
• Present-day continents are fragments of a “supercontinent” (Pangaea) that broke up about 225 million years ago.
• There were a number of pre-Pangaea supercontinents, although the evidence becomes more and more
obscure/problematic the farther back in geologic time. Pangaea itself was the product of accretion of fragments of
pre-Pangaea supercontinent.
• More than 80% of the world’s earthquakes and volcanoes occur along or near boundaries of the tectonic plates.
Endnotes
Mt. Rainier
Snow-clad Mt. Rainier, a 4,392 m-high volcano built
by plate-tectonic processes, dominates the pastoral
scene around Orting, Washington.
This valley is an inviting place for people to live,
work, and play, but it is also highly vulnerable to
destructive mudflows that could be generated by
renewed eruptive activity at Mt. Rainier. Society
must learn to "coexist“ intelligently with active
volcanoes. (Photograph by David E. Wieprecht, USGS).
W. Jacquelyne
Kious
About the Authors
Jackie Kious is a San Francisco Bay Area native. She has always
had an interest in writing, having started as a Journalism Major
at Skyline College. She was then accepted into the Special Major
program at San Francisco State University. This program
allowed her to design her own major combining her interest in
the earth and biological sciences with writing.
Since receiving her BS degree in Science Writing from San
Francisco State University, Jackie has written articles on subjects
ranging from DNA Fingerprinting and the Human Genome
Project to biodiversity in the rain forests and meteorology. In
1991, she attended an open house at the U.S. Geological Survey
(USGS) western regional headquarters in Menlo Park, where she
discovered the Volunteer For Science program. She signed up to
volunteer her time and was referred to the Geologic Division,
which had wanted to produce a general interest publication on
plate tectonics for some time.
After modifying a pre-existing rough
outline, she teamed up with Volcanologist
Bob Tilling to begin writing This Dynamic
Earth in January of 1992. Jackie is an
Administrative Assistant with the South
San Francisco Fire Department. In
addition to her volunteer work with the
USGS, she is currently writing a history of
the South San Francisco Fire Department
and assists with fundraising events for
Ronald McDonald House and is a citizen
volunteer with a local police department.
Robert I. Tilling
About the Authors
Born in Shanghai, China, Bob Tilling grew up in southern California near San Diego. He
received his B.A. from Pomona College, and a Ph.D. in geology from Yale University, before
joining the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) in 1962. Dr. Tilling has worked as a volcanologist for
nearly 25 years, beginning with his assignment in 1972 to the USGS' Hawaiian Volcano
Observatory (HVO), becoming its Scientist-in-Charge in 1975. He later served (1976-81) as the
Chief of the Office of Geochemistry and Geophysics, at USGS headquarters in Reston, Virginia,
and was in charge of the USGS studies before, during, and after the 18 May 1980 catastrophic
eruption of Mount St. Helens. Bob is no stranger to hazardous impacts of plate tectonics.
Since rotating back to a research position in 1982, Dr. Tilling resumed his studies of eruptive
phenomena and associated hazards in the U.S. and abroad. He has written many articles --
technical and general-interest-- and has served as an invited consultant to a number of foreign
countries (e.g., Colombia, Ecuador, Iceland, Indonesia, and Mexico). In February 1996, Bob
agreed once again to accept a management position: Chief Scientist of the USGS Volcano
Hazards Team, which is responsible for monitoring the active volcanoes in the U.S. and
assessing their potential hazards. In October 1999, he again rotated back to a research position.
Since 1987, Bob has worked at the USGS western regional center in Menlo Park, California. He
resides with his wife, Susan, in the foothills of the nearby Santa Cruz Mountains. They have
two grown daughters, Bobbi and Karen, both living in the San Francisco Bay Area, and one
grandson (Peter). When not studying volcanoes, Bob enjoys sculpting, hiking, playing
racquetball, listening to music (classical and country), and tasting of fine wines.
Further Reading
These works listed below furnish additional information on topics not covered, or only briefly discussed, in the booklet.
Attenborough, David, 1986, The Living Planet: British Broadcasting Corporation, 320 p.
(An informative, narrative version of the highly successful television series about how the Earth works.)
Coch, N.K., and Ludman, Allan, 1991, Physical Geology: Macmillan Publishing Company, New York, 678 p.
(Well illustrated college textbook that contains excellent chapters on topics related to Earth dynamics and plate
tectonics).
Cone, Joseph, 1991, Fire Under the Sea: William Morrow and Company, Inc., New York, 285 p. (paperback).
(A readable summary of oceanographic exploration and the discovery of volcanic hot springs on the ocean floor.)
Decker, Robert, and Decker, Barbara, 1989, Volcanoes: W.H. Freeman and Company, New York, 285 p. (paperback).
(An excellent introduction to the study of volcanoes written in an easy-to-read style.)
Duffield, W.A., Sass, J.H., and Sorey, M.L., 1994, Tapping the Earth's Natural Heat: U.S. Geological Survey Circular 1125, 63
p.
(A full-color book that describes, in non-technical terms, USGS studies of geothermal resources-one of the benefits
of plate tectonics-as a sustainable and relatively nonpolluting energy source.)
Ernst, W.G., 1990, The Dynamic Planet: Columbia University Press, New York, 280 p.
(A comprehensive college level textbook that includes good chapters on plate tectonics and related topics.)
Heliker, Christina, 1990, Volcanic and seismic hazards of the Island of Hawaii: U.S. Geological Survey generalinterest
publication, 48 p.
(A full-color booklet summarizing the volcanic, seismic, and tsunami hazards.)
Krafft, Maurice, 1993, Volcanoes: Fire from the Earth: Harry N. Abrams, New York, 207 p. (paperback).
(A well illustrated, non-technical primer on volcanoes; Maurice Krafft and his wife Katia were the world's foremost
photographers of volcanoes before they were killed during the June 1991 eruption of Unzen Volcano, Japan.)
Further Reading (continued)
Lindh, A.G., 1990, Earthquake prediction comes of age: Technology Review, Feb/March, p. 42-51.
(A good introduction to the basis and techniques used by scientists in attempting to predict earthquakes.)
McNutt, Steve, 1990, Loma Prieta earthquake, October 17, 1989: An overview: California Geology, v. 43, no. 1, p. 3-7.
(Along with the companion article by D.D. Montgomery, gives the essential information about this destructive
earthquake along the San Andreas Fault.)
McPhee, John, 1993, Assembling California: Farrar, Straus, & Giroux, New York, 303 p.
(A fascinating account of the role of plate tectonics in the geology of California, told in the typical McPhee style of
conversations with scientists.)
Montgomery, D.D., 1990, Effects of the Loma Prieta earthquake, October 17, 1989: California Geology, v. 43, no. 1, p. 8-13.
(Along with the companion article by Steve McNutt, gives the essential information about this destructive
earthquake along the San Andreas Fault.)
Ritchie, David, 1981, The Ring of Fire: New American Library, New York, 204 p. (paperback).
(A popularized account of earthquakes, volcanoes, and tsunamis that frequently strike the circum-Pacific regions.)
Schulz, S.S., and Wallace, R.E., 1989, The San Andreas Fault: U.S. Geological Survey general-interest publication, 16 p.
(This little booklet provides the basic information about the San Andreas Fault Zone, including a good discussion of
earthquakes that occur frequently along it.)
Simkin, Tom, Unger, J.D., Tilling, R.I., Vogt, P.R., and Spall, Henry, compilers, 1994, This Dynamic Planet: World map of
volcanoes,
earthquakes, impact craters and plate tectonics: 1 sheet, U.S. Geological Survey (USGS).
(In addition to the map's visually obvious physiographic features that relate to plate tectonics, the explanatory text
gives a concise summary of how plate tectonics work.)
Further Reading (continued)
Sullivan, Water, 1991, Continents in Motion: McGraw-Hill Book Co., New York, 430 p.
(A comprehensive review of the developments that culminated in the plate tectonics theory. Science Editor of the
New York Times, Sullivan is widely regarded as the "dean" of America's science writers.)
Tarbuck, Edward, and Lutgens, Frederick, 1985, Earth Science: Charles E. Merrill Publishing Co., Columbus, Ohio, 561 p.
(A college-level geology textbook that contains good chapters on plate tectonics and related topics.)
Tilling, R.I., 1991, Born of fire: Volcanoes and igneous rocks: Enslow Publishers, Inc., Hillside, New Jersey, 64 p.
(An introductory text about the kinds of volcanoes and their products and hazardous impacts-aimed at
approximately junior high- to high-school level.)
Tilling, R.I., Heliker, C., and Wright, T.L., 1987, Eruptions of Hawaiian Volcanoes: Past, present, and future: U.S. Geological
Survey
general-interest publication, 54 p.
(A nontechnical summary, illustrated by many color photographs, of the abundant data on Hawaiian volcanism;
similar in format to this book.)
Tilling, R.I., Topinka, Lyn, and Swanson, D.A., 1990, Eruptions of Mount St. Helens: Past, present, and future: U.S.
Geological Survey general-interest publication, 56 p.
(A nontechnical summary, illustrated by many color photographs and diagrams, of the abundant scientific data
available for the volcano, with emphasis on the catastrophic eruption of 18 May 1980; similar in format to this
book.)
Time-Life Books Inc., 1982, Volcano: 1983, Continents in Collision, in Planet Earth Series: Alexandria, Virginia, Time-Life
Books, 176 p. each.
(Informative and general surveys of volcanism and plate tectonics.)
Wright, T.L., and Pierson, T.C., 1992, Living with volcanoes: U.S. Geological Survey Circular 1073, 57 p.
(A nontechnical summary of the USGS' Volcano Hazards Program, highlighting the scientific studies used in
forecasting eruptions and assessing volcanic hazards, in the United States and abroad.)
This publication is one of a series of general interest publications prepared by the U.S. Geological Survey to provide
information about the earth sciences, natural resources, and the environment. To obtain a catalog of additional titles in the
series "General Interest Publications of the U.S. Geological Survey," write:
U.S. Geological Survey
Branch of Information Services
P.O. Box 25286
Denver, CO 80225
The paper version of this book can be ordered directly from the U.S. Geological Survey:
USGS Information Services
Box 25286, Building 810
Denver Federal Center
Denver, CO 80225
303-202-4700; Fax 303-202-4693
Or call toll-free 1-888-ASK-USGS
Visit the U.S. Geological Survey Earth Science Information Centers
As the Nation's principal conservation agency, the Department of the Interior has responsibility for most of our nationally
owned public lands and natural and cultural resources. This includes fostering sound use of our land and water resources;
protecting our fish, wildlife, and biological diversity; preserving the environmental and cultural values of our national parks
and historical places; and providing for the enjoyment of life through outdoor recreation. The Department assesses our
energy and mineral resources and works to ensure that their development is in the best interests of all our people by
encouraging stewardship and citizen participation in their care. The Department also has a major responsibility for
American Indian reservation communities and for people who live in island territories under U.S. administration.
Revision History
Not dated On the page tectonics.html, the Chinese province struck by an earthquake in 1976 was changed from Haicheng to
Hebei.
March 4, 1999 -- version 1.01
On the page cove.html, the box on the image showing Dinosaur Cove was moved westward to more accurately portray
its location.
May 5, 1999 -- version 1.02
Some changes were made to the layout in general. No changes were made to the content.
May 6, 1999 -- version 1.03
On the page cove.html, on the image, the words printed on Antarctica were changed to read "Antarctica 108 million
years ago" instead of "present day.“
June 24, 1999 -- version 1.04
On the page exploring.html, the location of Great Barrier Reef was stated as being off the northwestern coast of
Australia instead of the northeastern coast.
July 7, 1999 -- version 1.05
On the page Thingvellir.html, the caption was amended to state that the North American plate is to the right, not the
left.
December 13, 1999 -- version 1.06
On the page polar.html, the name "ellito" was changed to "ellioti" and "Gondwanaland" was changed to "Gondwana.“
March 28, 2000 -- version 1.07
On the page Endnotes.html, the authors' biographies were updated.
Revision History
January 29, 2001 -- version 1.08
On the page cove.html, the dates for positions of Australia and Antarctica have been revised from 108 to 104 million
years ago.
February 24, 2003 -- version 1.09
On the page Thingvellir.html, the caption has been amended for reasons of historical accuracy.
September 29, 2003 -- version 1.10
On the page hotspots.html, a link was added to http://www.mantleplumes.org for further reading on the topic.
January 20, 2007 -- version 1.11
On the page tectonics.html, the wording was amended to reflect that Northridge is a community within Los
Angeles.
March 27, 2007 -- version 1.12
On the page historical.html, Jurassic was changed from "135 million years ago" to "150 million years ago" in the
figure showing the supercontinent Pangaea.
November 25, 2008 -- version 1.13
On the page slabs.html, The edges of the graphic have been modified slightly.
January 13, 2009 -- version 1.14
On the page historical.html, Professor of Geology Alexander Du Toit taught at Witwatersrand University, not the
University of Johannesburg, as previously stated.
February, 2014 – BYU-Idaho version
August, 2016 – BYU-Idaho Reformatting
